Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 52. Health Care Decisions Act.
Sec. 13.52.187.
Refusal to make anatomical gift; effect of refusal.

An individual may refuse to make an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or part by

a record signed by

the individual; or

subject to (b) of this section, another individual acting at the direction of the individual if the individual is physically unable to sign;

the individual’s will, whether or not the will is admitted to probate or invalidated after the individual’s death; or

any form of communication made by the individual during the individual’s terminal condition addressed to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.

A record signed under (a)(1)(B) of this section must

be witnessed by at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request of the individual; and

state that it has been signed and witnessed as provided in (1) of this subsection.

An individual who has made a refusal may amend or revoke the refusal

in the manner provided in (a) of this section for making a refusal;

by subsequently making an anatomical gift under AS

13.52.177

that is inconsistent with the refusal; or

by destroying or canceling the record evidencing the refusal, or the portion of the record used to make the refusal, with the intent to revoke the refusal.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

13.52.193(h)

, in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the individual set out in the refusal, an individual’s unrevoked refusal to make an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or part bars all other persons from making an anatomical gift of the individual’s body or part.

History.

(§ 19 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.190.
Optional form for anatomical gift by another person. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.193.
Preclusive effect of anatomical gift, amendment, or revocation.

Except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section and subject to (f) of this section, in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor, a person other than the donor is barred from making, amending, or revoking an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or part if the donor made an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under AS

13.52.177

or an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under AS

13.52.183

.

A donor’s revocation of an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under AS

13.52.183

is not a refusal and does not bar another person specified in AS

13.52.173

or

13.52.197

from making an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under AS

13.52.177

or

13.52.203

.

If a person other than the donor makes an unrevoked anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under AS

13.52.177

or an amendment to an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part under AS

13.52.183

, another person may not make, amend, or revoke the gift of the donor’s body or part under AS

13.52.203

.

A revocation of an anatomical gift of a donor’s body or part under AS

13.52.183

by a person other than the donor does not bar another person from making an anatomical gift of the body or part under AS

13.52.177

or

13.52.203

.

In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or another person authorized to make an anatomical gift under AS

13.52.173

, an anatomical gift of a part is not a refusal to give another part or a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of another part at a later time by the donor or another person.

In the absence of an express, contrary indication by the donor or another person authorized to make an anatomical gift under AS

13.52.173

, an anatomical gift of a part for one or more of the purposes set out in AS

13.52.173

is not a limitation on the making of an anatomical gift of the part for any of the other purposes by the donor or any other person under AS

13.52.177

or

13.52.203

.

If a donor who is an unemancipated minor dies, a parent of the donor who is reasonably available may revoke or amend an anatomical gift of the donor’s body or part.

If an unemancipated minor who signed a refusal dies, a parent of the minor who is reasonably available may revoke the minor’s refusal.

History.

(§ 20 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.197.
Who may make anatomical gift of decedent’s body or part.

Subject to (b) and (c) of this section and unless barred by AS

13.52.187

or

13.52.193

, an anatomical gift of a decedent’s body or part for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education may be made by any member of the following classes of persons who is reasonably available, in the order of priority listed:

an agent of the decedent at the time of death who could have made an anatomical gift under AS

13.52.173

(2) immediately before the decedent’s death;

the spouse of the decedent;

adult children of the decedent;

parents of the decedent;

adult siblings of the decedent;

adult grandchildren of the decedent;

grandparents of the decedent;

an adult who exhibited special care and concern for the decedent;

the persons who were acting as the guardians of the person of the decedent at the time of death; and

any other person having the authority to dispose of the decedent’s body.

If there is more than one member of a class listed in (a)(1), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), or (9) of this section entitled to make an anatomical gift, an anatomical gift may be made by a member of the class unless that member or a person to whom the gift may pass under AS

13.52.207

knows of an objection by another member of the class. If an objection is known, the gift may be made only by a majority of the members of the class who are reasonably available.

A person may not make an anatomical gift if, at the time of the decedent’s death, a person in a prior class under (a) of this section is reasonably available to make or to object to the making of an anatomical gift.

History.

(§ 20 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.200.
Routine inquiry and required request; search and notification. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.203.
Manner of making, amending, or revoking anatomical gift of decedent’s body or part.

Notwithstanding AS

13.52.020

, a person authorized to make an anatomical gift under AS

13.52.197

may make an anatomical gift by a document of gift signed by the person making the gift or by that person’s oral communication that is electronically recorded or is contemporaneously reduced to a record and signed by the individual receiving the oral communication.

Subject to (c) of this section, an anatomical gift by a person authorized under AS

13.52.197

may be amended or revoked orally or in a record by any member of a prior class who is reasonably available. If more than one member of the prior class is reasonably available, the gift made by a person authorized under AS

13.52.197

may be

amended only if a majority of the reasonably available members agree to the amending of the gift; or

revoked only if a majority of the reasonably available members agree to the revoking of the gift or if they are equally divided as to whether to revoke the gift.

Notwithstanding AS

13.52.020

, a revocation under (b) of this section is effective only if, before an incision has been made to remove a part from the donor’s body or before invasive procedures have begun to prepare the recipient, the procurement organization, transplant hospital, or physician or technician knows of the revocation.

History.

(§ 21 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.207.
Persons who may receive anatomical gift; purpose of anatomical gift.

An anatomical gift may be made to the following persons named in the document of gift:

a hospital, an accredited medical school, a dental school, a college, a university, an organ procurement organization, or another appropriate person, for research or education;

subject to (b) of this section, an individual designated by the person making the anatomical gift if the individual is the recipient of the part;

an eye bank or a tissue bank.

If an anatomical gift to an individual under (a)(2) of this section cannot be transplanted into the individual, the part passes under (g) of this section in the absence of an express, contrary indication by the person making the anatomical gift.

If an anatomical gift of one or more specific parts or of all parts is made in a document of gift that does not name a person described in (a) of this section but identifies the purpose for which an anatomical gift may be used, the following rules apply:

if the part is an eye and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate eye bank;

if the part is tissue and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate tissue bank;

if the part is an organ and the gift is for the purpose of transplantation or therapy, the gift passes to the appropriate organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ;

if the part is an organ, an eye, or tissue and the gift is for the purpose of research or education, the gift passes to the appropriate procurement organization.

For the purpose of (c) of this section, if there is more than one purpose of an anatomical gift set out in the document of gift but the purposes are not set out in any priority, the gift shall be used for transplantation or therapy, if suitable. If the gift cannot be used for transplantation or therapy, the gift may be used for research or education.

If an anatomical gift of one or more specific parts is made in a document of gift that does not name a person described in (a) of this section and does not identify the purpose of the gift, the gift may be used only for transplantation or therapy, and the gift passes under (g) of this section.

If a document of gift specifies only a general intent to make an anatomical gift by words such as “donor,” “organ donor,” or “body donor,” or by a symbol or statement of similar import, the gift may be used only for transplantation or therapy, and the gift passes under (g) of this section.

For purposes of (b), (e), and (f) of this section, the following rules apply:

if the part is an eye, the gift passes to the appropriate eye bank;

if the part is tissue, the gift passes to the appropriate tissue bank;

if the part is an organ, the gift passes to the appropriate organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.

An anatomical gift of an organ for transplantation or therapy, other than an anatomical gift under (a)(2) of this section, passes to the organ procurement organization as custodian of the organ.

If an anatomical gift does not pass under (a) — (h) of this section or the decedent’s body or part is not used for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, custody of the body or part passes to the person under obligation to dispose of the body or part.

A person may not accept an anatomical gift if the person knows that the gift was not effectively made under AS

13.52.177

or

13.52.203

or if the person knows that the decedent made a refusal under AS

13.52.187

that was not revoked. For purposes of this subsection, if a person knows that an anatomical gift was made on a document of gift, the person is considered to know of any amendment or revocation of the gift or any refusal to make an anatomical gift on the same document of gift.

Except as otherwise provided in (a)(2) of this section, nothing in AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

affects the allocation of organs for transplantation or therapy.

History.

(§ 21 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.210.
Persons who may become donees; purposes for which anatomical gifts may be made. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.213.
Search and notification.

The following persons shall make a reasonable search of an individual who the person reasonably believes is dead or near death for a document of gift or other information identifying the individual as a donor or as an individual who made a refusal:

a law enforcement officer, a firefighter, a paramedic, or another emergency rescuer finding the individual; and

if another source of the information is not immediately available, a hospital, as soon as practical after the individual’s arrival at the hospital.

If a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift is located by the search required by (a)(1) of this section and the individual or deceased individual to whom it relates is taken to a hospital, the person responsible for conducting the search shall send the document of gift or refusal to the hospital.

Except as provided by AS

13.52.080

and

13.52.090

, a person is not subject to criminal or civil liability for failing to discharge the duties imposed by this section but may be subject to administrative sanctions.

History.

(§ 22 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.217.
Delivery of document of gift not required; right to examine.

A document of gift need not be delivered during the donor’s lifetime to be effective.

On or after an individual’s death, a person in possession of a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift with respect to the individual shall allow examination and copying of the document of gift or refusal by a person authorized to make or object to the making of an anatomical gift with respect to the individual or by a person to whom the gift could pass under AS

13.52.207

.

History.

(§ 22 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.220.
Delivery of document of gift. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.223.
Rights and duties of procurement organization and others.

When a hospital refers an individual at or near death to a procurement organization, the organization shall make a reasonable search of the records of the department and a donor registry.

A procurement organization shall be allowed reasonable access to information in the records of the department to ascertain whether an individual at or near death is a donor.

Except as provided by AS

13.52.253

, when a hospital refers an individual at or near death to a procurement organization, the organization may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a part that is or could be the subject of an anatomical gift for transplantation, therapy, research, or education from a donor or a prospective donor. Except as provided by AS

13.52.055

or

13.52.253

, during the examination period, measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the part may not be withheld or withdrawn, unless the hospital or procurement organization knows that the individual expressed a contrary intent.

Unless prohibited by law other than AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

, at any time after a donor’s death, the person to whom a part passes under AS

13.52.207

may conduct any reasonable examination necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the body or part for its intended purpose.

Unless prohibited by law other than AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

, an examination under (c) or (d) of this section may include an examination of all medical and dental records of the donor or prospective donor.

Upon the death of a minor who was a donor or had signed a refusal, unless a procurement organization knows the minor is emancipated, the procurement organization shall conduct a reasonable search for the parents of the minor and provide the parents with an opportunity to revoke or amend the anatomical gift or revoke the refusal.

Upon referral by a hospital under (a) of this section, a procurement organization shall make a reasonable search for any person listed in AS

13.52.197

having priority to make an anatomical gift on behalf of a prospective donor. If a procurement organization receives information that an anatomical gift to any other person was made, amended, or revoked, it shall promptly advise the other person of all relevant information.

Subject to AS

13.52.207(i)

and

13.52.257

, the rights of the person to whom a part passes under AS

13.52.207

are superior to the rights of all others with respect to the part. The person may accept or reject an anatomical gift in whole or in part. Subject to the terms of the document of gift and AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

, a person who accepts an anatomical gift of an entire body may allow embalming, burial, or cremation, and use of remains in a funeral service. If the gift is of a part, the person to whom the part passes under AS

13.52.207

, on the death of the donor and before embalming, burial, or cremation, shall cause the part to be removed without unnecessary mutilation.

The physician who attends the decedent at death and the physician who determines the time of the decedent’s death may not participate in the procedures for removing or transplanting a part from the decedent.

A physician or technician may remove a donated part from the body of a donor that the physician or technician is qualified to remove.

History.

(§ 23 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.227.
Coordination of procurement and use.

A hospital in this state shall enter into agreements or affiliations with procurement organizations for coordination of procurement and use of anatomical gifts.

History.

(§ 23 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.230.
Rights and duties at death. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.233.
Sale or purchase of parts prohibited; charges allowed.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a person who, for valuable consideration, knowingly purchases or sells a part for transplantation or therapy if removal of a part from an individual is intended to occur after the individual’s death commits a class C felony.

A person may charge a reasonable amount for the removal, processing, preservation, quality control, storage, transportation, implantation, or disposal of a part.

History.

(§ 24 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.240.
Coordination of procurement and use. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.243.
Immunity.

Except as provided by AS

13.52.080

and

13.52.090

, a person who acts under AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

or with the applicable anatomical gift law of another state, or attempts in good faith to act under AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

or with the applicable anatomical gift law of another state, is not liable for the act in a civil action, a criminal prosecution, or an administrative proceeding.

Except as provided by AS

13.52.080

and

13.52.090

, a person making an anatomical gift and the donor’s estate are not liable for any injury or damage that results from the making or use of the gift.

In determining whether an anatomical gift has been made, amended, or revoked under AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

, a person may rely on representations of an individual listed in AS

13.52.197(a)(2)

— (8) relating to the individual’s relationship to the donor or prospective donor unless the person knows that the representation is untrue.

History.

(§ 25 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.247.
Law governing validity; choice of law as to execution of document of gift; presumption of validity.

Notwithstanding AS

13.52.010(k)

, a document of gift is valid if executed under

AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

;

the laws of the state or country where it was executed; or

the laws of the state or country where the person making the anatomical gift was domiciled, has a place of residence, or was a national at the time the document of gift was executed.

If a document of gift is valid under this section, the law of this state governs the interpretation of the document of gift.

A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment of an anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows that it was not validly executed or was revoked.

History.

(§ 25 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.250.
Sale or purchase of parts prohibited. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.253.
Effect of anatomical gift on advance health care directive.

Except as provided by AS

13.52.055

, if a prospective donor has an advance health care directive, and the terms of the directive and the express terms of a potential anatomical gift are in conflict with regard to the administration of measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of a part for transplantation or therapy, the prospective donor’s attending physician and prospective donor shall confer to resolve the conflict. If the prospective donor is incapable of resolving the conflict, an agent acting under the prospective donor’s declaration or directive, or, if none or the agent is not reasonably available, another person authorized by law other than AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

to make health care decisions on behalf of the prospective donor, shall act for the donor to resolve the conflict. The conflict shall be resolved as expeditiously as possible. Information relevant to the resolution of the conflict may be obtained from the appropriate procurement organization and any other person authorized to make an anatomical gift for the prospective donor under AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

. Before resolution of the conflict, measures necessary to ensure the medical suitability of the part may not be withheld or withdrawn from the prospective donor unless withholding or withdrawing the measures conflicts with appropriate end-of-life care.

History.

(§ 26 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.255.
Cooperation between coroner, state medical examiner, and procurement organization.

A coroner and a state medical examiner shall cooperate with procurement organizations to maximize the opportunity to recover anatomical gifts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If a coroner or a state medical examiner receives notice from a procurement organization that an anatomical gift might be available or was made with respect to a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the coroner or state medical examiner and a postmortem examination is going to be performed, unless the coroner or state medical examiner denies recovery under AS

13.52.257

, the coroner, the state medical examiner, or a designee shall conduct a postmortem examination of the body or the part in a manner and within a period compatible with its preservation for the purposes of the gift.

A part may not be removed from the body of a decedent under the jurisdiction of a coroner or a state medical examiner for transplantation, therapy, research, or education unless the part is the subject of an anatomical gift. The body of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the coroner or state medical examiner may not be delivered to a person for research or education unless the body is the subject of an anatomical gift. This subsection does not preclude a coroner or the state medical examiner from performing the medicolegal investigation on the body or parts of a decedent under the jurisdiction of the coroner or state medical examiner.

History.

(§ 26 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.257.
Facilitation of anatomical gift from decedent whose body is under jurisdiction of coroner or state medical examiner.

On request of a procurement organization, a coroner or the state medical examiner may release to the procurement organization the name, contact information, and available medical and social history of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the coroner or state medical examiner. If the decedent’s body or part is medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education, the coroner or state medical examiner shall release postmortem examination results to the procurement organization. The procurement organization may make a subsequent disclosure of the postmortem examination results or other information received from the coroner or state medical examiner only if relevant to transplantation or therapy.

The coroner or state medical examiner may conduct a medicolegal examination by reviewing all medical records, laboratory test results, x-rays, other diagnostic results, and other information that any person possesses about a donor or prospective donor whose body is under the jurisdiction of the coroner or state medical examiner that the coroner or state medical examiner determines may be relevant to the investigation.

A person who has any information requested by a coroner or the state medical examiner under (b) of this section shall provide that information as expeditiously as possible to allow the coroner or state medical examiner to conduct the medicolegal investigation within a period compatible with the preservation of parts for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If an anatomical gift has been or might be made of a part of a decedent whose body is under the jurisdiction of the coroner or state medical examiner and a postmortem examination is not required, or the coroner or state medical examiner determines that a postmortem examination is required but that the recovery of the part that is the subject of an anatomical gift will not interfere with the examination, the coroner or state medical examiner and the procurement organization shall cooperate in the timely removal of the part from the decedent for the purpose of transplantation, therapy, research, or education.

If an anatomical gift of a part from the decedent under the jurisdiction of the coroner or state medical examiner has been or might be made, but the coroner or state medical examiner initially believes that the recovery of the part could interfere with the postmortem investigation into the decedent’s cause or manner of death, the coroner or state medical examiner may consult with the procurement organization, or the physician or technician designated by the procurement organization, about the proposed recovery. After consultation, the coroner or state medical examiner may allow the recovery.

If the coroner, the state medical examiner, or a designee denies recovery of a part, the coroner, state medical examiner, or designee shall

explain in a record the specific reasons for not allowing recovery of the part;

include the specific reasons in the records of the coroner or state medical examiner; and

provide a record with the specific reasons to the procurement organization.

If the coroner, the state medical examiner, or a designee allows recovery of a part under (d) or (e) of this section, the procurement organization, on request, shall cause the physician or technician who removes the part to provide the coroner or state medical examiner with a record describing the condition of the part, a biopsy, a photograph, and any other information and observations that would assist in the postmortem examination.

If a coroner, state medical examiner, or designee elects to be present at a removal procedure, on request, the procurement organization requesting the recovery of the part shall reimburse the coroner, state medical examiner, or designee for the additional costs incurred in complying with this section.

History.

(§ 26 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.260.
Examination, autopsy, liability. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.263.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.267

modify, limit, and supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001 — 7031 (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act), except that AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.267

do not modify, limit or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

History.

(§ 27 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.265.
Prohibition against authorization by coroner, state medical examiner, or local public health official. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.267.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.263

, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

(§ 28 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.52.268.
Definitions for AS 13.52.173 — 13.52.268.

Notwithstanding AS

13.52.390

, in AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

,

“adult” means an individual who is at least 18 years of age;

“decedent” means a deceased individual whose body or part is or may be the source of an anatomical gift; the term includes a stillborn infant and, subject to restrictions imposed by law other than AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

, a fetus;

“department” means the Department of Administration;

“disinterested witness” means a witness who is not

the spouse, child, parent, sibling, grandchild, grandparent, or guardian of the individual who makes, amends, revokes, or refuses to make an anatomical gift;

an adult who exhibited special care and concern for the individual; or

a person to whom an anatomical gift could pass under AS

13.52.207

;

“document of gift” means a donor card or other record used to make an anatomical gift, and includes a statement or symbol on a driver’s license, an identification card, or a donor registry;

“donor” means an individual whose body or part is the subject of an anatomical gift;

“donor registry” means the donor registry created under AS

13.50.110

;

“driver’s license” means a license or permit issued by the department under AS 28.15 to operate a vehicle, whether or not conditions are attached to the license or permit;

“eye bank” means a person who is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of human eyes or portions of human eyes;

“guardian” means a person appointed by a court to make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, or welfare of an individual; the term does not include a guardian ad litem;

“hospital” means a facility licensed as a hospital under the law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the United States, a state, or a subdivision of a state;

“identification card” means an identification card issued by the Department of Administration under AS

18.65.310

;

“know” means to have actual knowledge;

“minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age;

“organ procurement organization” means a person designated by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services as an organ procurement organization;

“parent” means a parent whose parental rights have not been terminated;

“person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“physician” means an individual authorized to practice medicine or osteopathy under the law of any state;

“procurement organization” means an eye bank, an organ procurement organization, or a tissue bank;

“prospective donor” means an individual who is dead or near death and has been determined by a procurement organization to have a part that could be medically suitable for transplantation, therapy, research, or education; the term does not include an individual who has made a refusal;

“reasonably available” means able to be contacted by a procurement organization without undue effort and willing and able to act in a timely manner consistent with existing medical criteria necessary for the making of an anatomical gift;

“recipient” means an individual into whose body a decedent’s part has been or is intended to be transplanted;

“record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or another medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“refusal” means a record created under AS

13.52.187

that expressly states an intent to bar other persons from making an anatomical gift of an individual’s body or part;

“sign” means, with the present intent to authenticate or adopt a record,

to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

to attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“state medical examiner” means the state medical examiner appointed under AS

12.65.015(a)

;

“technician” means an individual determined to be qualified to remove or process parts by an appropriate organization that is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law; the term includes an enucleator;

“tissue” means a portion of the human body other than an organ or an eye; the term does not include blood unless the blood is donated for the purpose of research or education;

“tissue bank” means a person who is licensed, accredited, or regulated under federal or state law to engage in the recovery, screening, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of tissue;

“transplant hospital” means a hospital that furnishes organ transplants and other medical and surgical specialty services required for the care of transplant patients.

History.

(§ 28 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (2) of this section, “AS

13.52.173

—

13.52.268

” was substituted for “AS

13.52.173

— 13.52.168” to correct a manifest error in ch. 100, SLA 2008.

Sec. 13.52.270.
Applicability provisions. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.275.
Construction where mental illness.

In the case of mental illness, nothing in this chapter may be construed to override or undermine the validity of a properly executed durable power of attorney for health care.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.52.280.
Uniformity of application and construction. [Repealed, § 36 ch 100 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.52.290.
Severability.

If a provision of this chapter, or the application of this chapter to a person or circumstance is held invalid, including being held unconstitutional, the invalidity does not affect the other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

History.

(§ 3 ch 83 SLA 2004)